Hawaii statutes.
§281-75 Analyses. Whenever the liquor
commission or investigator thereof has reason to believe or suspect, on
complaint or otherwise, that any liquor being manufactured or which is
possessed or kept for sale by any licensee is or may be impure or adulterated
or otherwise not conformable to any lawful requirement, the commission or
investigator thereof or other person authorized in writing by the commission or
by the investigator may secure a sample thereof for analysis. Upon such sample
being obtained, as though by ostensible purchase or otherwise, the person
procuring the same shall immediately disclose to the licensee the person's
office or authority and purpose, and in case the procurer is a person other
than the commission or the investigator the procurer shall then deliver to the
licensee a copy of the written order for the procurement of the sample. The
bottle or other container containing the sample shall then and there be sealed
by the procurer thereof before being taken from the premises of the licensee
and the licensee may also attach the licensee's seal thereto.

The investigator shall cause the sample so
obtained to be immediately delivered with the seal or seals unbroken to the
state department of health or some competent analyst employed by the commission
who shall make an analysis of the liquor and shall send a certified report
thereof to the investigator, who shall immediately file the same with the
commission's administrator.

If the sample analyzed is found pure and
unadulterated and conformable with all legal requirements for such liquor, the
certificate referred to in the preceding paragraph shall so state, and the
commission shall pay to the licensee a sum equal to the value of the sample,
and if requested by the licensee the administrator shall furnish the licensee a
copy of the analysis.

If the certificate of analysis shows the sample
to be impure or adulterated or contrary to any legal requirement the licensee
shall be prosecuted for selling, or offering for sale, or furnishing forbidden
liquor in violation of this chapter. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §41; RL 1935, §2610; RL
1945, §7263; RL 1955, §159-74; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §281-75; gen ch
1985; am L 1990, c 171, §22]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next